Utah statutes.
53A-17a-107.   Professional staff weighted pupil units.
(1)  Professional staff weighted pupil units are computed and distributed in
accordance with the following schedule:
(a)  Professional Staff Cost Formula
  Master's
     Years of           Bachelor's      Bachelor's      Master's
Degree
    Experience            Degree        +30 Qt. Hr.      Degree         +45
Qt. Hr.     Doctorate
1                 1.00               1.05         1.10              1.15
1.20
2                 1.05               1.10         1.15              1.20
1.25
3                 1.10               1.15         1.20              1.25
1.30
4                 1.15               1.20         1.25              1.30
1.35
5                 1.20               1.25         1.30              1.35
1.40
6                 1.25               1.30         1.35              1.40
1.45
7                 1.30               1.35         1.40              1.45
1.50
8                 1.35               1.40         1.45              1.50
1.55
9                                                 1.50              1.55
1.60
10                                                                  1.60
1.65
11
1.70
(b)  Multiply the number of full-time or equivalent professional personnel in
each applicable experience category in Subsection (1)(a) by the applicable
weighting factor.
(c)  Divide the total of Subsection (1)(b) by the number of professional
personnel included in Subsection (1)(b) and reduce the quotient by 1.00.
(d)  Multiply the result of Subsection (1)(c) by 1/4 of the weighted pupil
units computed in accordance with Sections 53A-17a-106 and 53A-17a-109.
(2)  The State Board of Education shall enact rules in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, which require a certain
percentage of a district's professional staff to be certified in the area in
which they teach in order for the district to receive full funding under the
schedule.
(3)  If an individual's teaching experience is a factor in negotiating a
contract of employment to teach in the state's public schools, then the local
school board is encouraged to accept as credited experience all of the years
the individual has taught in the state's public schools.
